Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 3. Compensation of Legislators.

Administrative Code. —

For leave rules, see 2 AAC 08.

Sec. 24.10.100.
Salary of legislators.

Legislators shall receive a monthly salary under AS 39.23. The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives may receive additional compensation under AS 39.23 during tenure of office.

History.

(§ 2 ch 26 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 149 SLA 1966; am § 9 ch 193 SLA 1970; am § 4 ch 205 SLA 1975; am § 6 ch 148 SLA 1976; am § 7 ch 263 SLA 1976; am §§ 14, 28 ch 3 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 83 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 87 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 124 SLA 1986; am § 8 ch 4 FSSLA 1996; am § 2 ch 21 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

24.15.020

.
Renumbered in 1985.

Under secs. 26 and 28(1),
ch. 21, SLA 2008, the amendment to this section made by sec. 2,
ch. 21, SLA 2008, took effect July 1, 2009, which was the effective date of the provision of
ch. 12, SLA 2009 that fully funded the salary recommendation of the State Officers Compensation Commission dated January 10, 2009.

Opinions of attorney general. —

It is impossible for a newly appointed member of the legislature to receive salary until he is sworn in as a member of the legislature pursuant to AS

24.05.170

. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 20.

Collateral references. —

72 Am. Jur. 2d, States, Territories, and Dependencies, § 58.

81A C.J.S., States, §§ 98-102.

Validity and construction of orders and enactments requiring disclosure by public officers and employees, or candidates for office. 22 ALR4th 237.

Sec. 24.10.101.
Compensation of legislators. [Effective date repealed, § 27 ch 21 SLA 2008; see also § 18 ch 21 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 24.10.105.
Legislative per diem. [Repealed, § 79 ch 63 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 24.10.110.
Additional allowances.

In addition, each member of the legislature is entitled to an annual allowance prescribed in accordance with AS 39.23 for postage, stationery, stenographic services, and other expenses.

History.

(§ 3 ch 26 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 8 SLA 1970; am § 10 ch 193 SLA 1970; am § 8 ch 263 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 24.15.030.
Renumbered in 1985.

Sec. 24.10.120.
Method of payment.

Salaries, per diem, travel expenses, relocation expenses, and additional allowances for members of the legislature shall be paid as approved by the legislative fiscal officer. The legislative fiscal officer may not approve payment for a member’s travel outside the United States unless the member first provides a report establishing that the travel has a legislative purpose. The legislative fiscal officer shall provide a form on which a report under this subsection must be submitted.

The legislative fiscal officer shall file a travel and compensation report with the legislature’s fiscal office by January 31 of each year. The report must contain detailed information for the previous calendar year of the salaries, per diem, travel expenses, relocation expenses, and any additional allowances for each legislator and each legislative director.

History.

(§ 4 ch 26 SLA 1961; am § 3 ch 83 SLA 1983; am § 3 ch 124 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 83 SLA 1999; am § 3 ch 61 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 24.15.040.
Renumbered in 1985.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 20, 2018, in (a), added the second and third sentences. Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 17, ch. 61, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 19, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 20, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Editor's notes. —

For provision relating to the severability of the 2018 amendment to this section, see sec. 15, ch. 61, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 24.10.130.
Moving expenses and per diem allowance.

A member of the legislature may be entitled to reimbursement for the expenses of moving between the member’s place of residence and the capital city for the purpose of attending a regular session of the legislature.

Legislators and officers and employees of the legislative branch of government may be entitled to a per diem allowance; however, if a bill that fully funds an operating budget has not, within the first 121 consecutive days of a regular legislative session, including the day the legislature first convenes in that regular session, been passed by the legislature, a member of the legislature is not entitled to a daily per diem allowance for a day the legislature is in session after that 121-day period until the first day after a bill that fully funds an operating budget is passed by the legislature or the first day of the next regular legislative session, whichever occurs earlier. In this subsection, “passed by the legislature” has the meaning given in AS

01.10.070

.

The Alaska Legislative Council shall adopt a policy in accordance with (b) of this section and AS

39.23.540(d)

regarding reimbursement for moving expenses and payment of a per diem allowance. The policy must set conditions for the reimbursement for moving expenses and payment of per diem and prescribe the amounts of reimbursement adapted to the special needs of the legislative branch as determined by the council.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1959; am § 4 ch 100 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 106 SLA 1975; am § 29 ch 3 SLA 1980; am § 52 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 3 ch 21 SLA 2008; am §§ 4, 5 ch 61 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 24.15.050.
Renumbered in 1985.

Under secs. 26 and 28(1),
ch. 21, SLA 2008, the amendment to this section made by sec. 2,
ch. 21, SLA 2008, took effect July 1, 2009, which was the effective date of the provision of
ch. 12, SLA 2009 that fully funded the salary recommendation of the State Officers Compensation Commission dated January 10, 2009.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 20, 2018, in (b), added the language beginning “; however if a bill that fully funds an operating budget” through the end of the subsection; in (c), inserted “(b) of this section and” following “in accordance with”, substituted “moving expenses and payment of a per diem allowance” for “moving expenses applicable to all legislators and an applicable per diem allowance policy” at the end of the first sentence. Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 17, ch. 61, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 19, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 20, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Editor's notes. —

For provision relating to the severability of the 2018 amendments to this section, see sec. 15, ch. 61, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.